Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska37-1224
Motorboat; removed from the state or transferred; registration fee; claim for refund; how computed.

When the owner of any vessel registered under the State Boat Act moves out of the state or upon the transfer of ownership of any vessel, such owner or transferor shall be credited with the number of unexpired months remaining in the registration period. If such vessel is removed from the state or transferred within the same calendar month in which it was registered, no refund shall be allowed for such month. Any individual moving out of the state or transferring ownership to any vessel may file a claim for refund with the commission upon forms provided by the commission. The commission shall make payment to the claimant from money available from the State Game Fund appropriated for such purpose, but no refund shall be paid if less than twelve months remains in the registration period.

Laws 1978, LB 21, § 24;

Laws 1999, LB 176, § 112.